Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska82-105
Nebraska State Historical Society; public documents, records, relics; obtaining possession; procedure.

The Nebraska State Historical Society shall obtain possession of the historical material mentioned in section 82-104 whenever it is not in active use in any department, institution, or building, or whenever it is liable to damage and destruction because of a lack of proper means to care for or safe and adequate place to preserve it. The officer or board having the care and management of the department, institution, or building shall consent in writing to the custody of the documents, records, and materials by the society. The society shall prepare invoices and receipts in triplicate for the material turned over to the society and shall deliver one copy to the Secretary of State and one copy to the officer or board turning over the material, and one copy shall be retained by the Director of the Nebraska State Historical Society.

Laws 1905, c. 157, § 2, p. 604;

R.S.1913, § 7170;

C.S.1922, § 6821;

C.S.1929, § 82-105;

R.S.1943, § 82-105;

Laws 1969, c. 810, § 1, p. 3047;

Laws 2024, LB1169, § 6.
July 19, 2024